Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-919
Area withdrawn; obligations incurred after withdrawal; not subject to assessment.

An area withdrawn from a district shall not be subject to assessment or otherwise chargeable for any obligation of any nature or kind incurred after the withdrawal of the area from the district.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 11, p. 141.